Utah statutes.
31A-8-403.   Examination of organization and providers.

Examinations of a health maintenance organization and its providers shall be conducted according to the provisions of Chapter 2.  Except during an audit of the internal quality control system, medical records of individual patients kept by the organization or its providers are not subject to examination.

